California, session 20252026, SB475.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 12098.3 of the Government Code is amended to read:12098.3. (a) The Small Business Advocate shall be appointed by, and shall serve at the pleasure of, the Governor.(b) The Governor shall appoint the employees who are needed to accomplish the purposes of this article.(c) The duties and functions of the advocate shall include all of the following:(1) Serve as the principal advocate in the state on behalf of small businesses, including, but not limited to, advisory participation in the consideration of all legislation and administrative regulations that affect small businesses, and advocacy on state policy and programs related to small businesses.(2) Represent the views and interests of small businesses before other state agencies whose agencies, the policies and activities of which, may affect small business.(3) Enlist the cooperation and assistance of public and private agencies, businesses, and other organizations in disseminating information about the programs and services provided by state government that are of benefit to benefit small businesses, and information on how small businesses can participate in, or make use of, those programs and services.(4) Consult with experts and authorities in the fields of small business investment, venture capital investment, and commercial banking and other comparable financial institutions involved in the financing of business, and with individuals with regulatory, legal, economic, or financial expertise, including members of the academic community, and individuals who generally represent the public interest.(5) Seek the assistance and cooperation of all state agencies and departments providing services to, or affecting, small business, including the small business liaison designated pursuant to Section 11148.5, to ensure coordination of state efforts. The advocate shall fulfill this duty by, among other activities, maintaining, publicizing, and distributing an annual list of persons serving as small business liaisons throughout the state.(6) Receive and respond to complaints from small businesses concerning the actions of state agencies and the operative effects of state laws and regulations adversely affecting those businesses.(7) Counsel small businesses on how to resolve questions and problems concerning the relationship of small business to state government.(8) Collaborate with the Office of Small Business and Disabled Veteran Business Enterprise Services in their activities under the Small Business Procurement and Contract Act (Chapter 6.5 (commencing with Section 14835) of Part 5.5), including, but not limited to, promoting small business certification and undertaking reasonable means to assist state agencies in improving small business participation. Among other activities, the advocate shall maintain, publicize, and distribute an annual list of persons serving as a small business advocate, designated pursuant to Section 14846, throughout state government.(9) Collaborate with the California Disabled Veteran Enterprise Program Advocate, appointed pursuant to Section 999.11 of the Military and Veterans Code, regarding the implementation of the California Disabled Veteran Business Enterprise Program (Article 6 (commencing with Section 999) of Chapter 6 of Division 4 of the Military and Veterans Code), including, but not limited to, promoting disabled veteran business enterprise certification to veteran entrepreneurs and veteran-owned small businesses and undertaking reasonable means to assist state agencies in improving small business and disabled business enterprise procurement participation. The advocate shall fulfill this duty by, among other activities, publicizing the annual list of persons serving as a Disabled Veteran Business Enterprise Program Advocate, designated appointed pursuant to Section 999.12 of the Military and Veterans Code, throughout the state.